Maryland, session 2026, HB0441.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
21–809.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0441*

HOUSE BILL 441
(a) (9) “Speed monitoring system” means a device with one or more motor
vehicle sensors producing recorded images of motor vehicles traveling at speeds at least 12
miles per hour above the posted speed limit.
(b) (1) (vii) 1. Not more than six mobile or stationary speed monitoring
systems may be placed on Maryland Route 210 (Indian Head Highway).
(g) (1) If a person liable under this section does not pay the civil penalty or
contest the violation, the Administration may refuse to register or reregister the motor
vehicle cited for the violation.
(2) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH APPLIES ONLY TO VIOLATIONS
RECORDED BY A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM PLACED ON MARYLAND ROUTE 210
(INDIAN HEAD HIGHWAY) IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY.
(II) 1. SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, IF A PERSON LIABLE UNDER THIS SECTION DOES NOT PAY THE CIVIL
PENALTY OR CONTEST THE VIOLATION, THE ADMINISTRATION, ON NOTICE FROM
PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY, MAY SUSPEND THE REGISTRATION OF THE MOTOR
VEHICLE INVOLVED IN THE VIOLATION.
2. IF THE ADMINISTRATION DETERMINES THAT A
SUSPENSION SHOULD BE IMPOSED UNDER THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, THE
ADMINISTRATION SHALL GIVE WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE OWNER OF THE MOTOR
VEHICLE, AND THE OWNER MAY REQUEST A HEARING AS PROVIDED IN TITLE 12,
SUBTITLE 2 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(III) 1. THE ADMINISTRATION, ON NOTICE FROM PRINCE
GEORGE’S COUNTY, SHALL SUSPEND THE REGISTRATION OF A MOTOR VEHICLE
INVOLVED IN VIOLATIONS FOR WHICH THE OWNER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE OR THE
PERSON LIABLE UNDER THIS SECTION:
A. WITHIN ANY 90–DAY PERIOD, DOES NOT PAY THE
CIVIL PENALTY OR CONTEST THE VIOLATION FOR AT LEAST THREE OVERDUE
CITATIONS; OR
B. AT ANY TIME, DOES NOT PAY THE CIVIL PENALTY OR
CONTEST THE VIOLATION FOR ANY NUMBER OF OVERDUE CITATIONS THAT TOTAL
AT LEAST $500 IN CIVIL PENALTIES.
2. THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL REINSTATE A
REGISTRATION SUSPENDED UNDER THIS SUBPARAGRAPH ON NOTICE FROM PRINCE
GEORGE’S COUNTY THAT THE OWNER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE OR THE PERSON
LIABLE UNDER THIS SECTION HAS PAID:

HOUSE BILL 441 3
A. ALL OVERDUE CIVIL PENALTIES AND ANY RELATED
FEES AND COURT COSTS APPLICABLE TO THE MOTOR VEHICLE THAT DERIVED FROM
THE OVERDUE CITATIONS; AND
B. A $30 ADMINISTRATIVE FEE TO PRINCE GEORGE’S
COUNTY.
(IV) 1. ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2026, AND EACH
DECEMBER 1 THEREAFTER, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL REPORT TO THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, ON ACTIONS TAKEN UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH.
2. THE REPORT SHALL INCLUDE:
A. THE NUMBER OF REGISTRATIONS SUSPENDED UNDER
THIS PARAGRAPH, BROKEN DOWN BY THE REASONS FOR THE SUSPENSIONS;
B. THE NUMBER OF REGISTRATIONS REINSTATED
AFTER BEING SUSPENDED UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH;
C. A GEOGRAPHIC BREAKDOWN OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE
REGISTRATIONS SUSPENDED UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH; AND
D. A DESCRIPTION OF THE OUTCOMES OF COURT
PROCEEDINGS INVOLVING PERSONS SUBJECT TO THIS PARAGRAPH.
26–305.
(a) The Administration may not register or transfer the registration of any vehicle
involved in a parking violation under this subtitle, a violation under any federal parking
regulation that applies to property in this State under the jurisdiction of the U.S.
government, a violation of § 21–202(h) of this article as determined under § 21–202.1 of this
article or Title 21, Subtitle 8 of this article as determined under § 21–809 or § 21–810 of
this article, or a violation of the Illegal Dumping and Litter Control Law under § 10–110 of
the Criminal Law Article or a local law or ordinance adopted by Baltimore City relating to
the unlawful disposal of litter as determined under § 10–112 of the Criminal Law Article,
if:
(1) It is notified by a political subdivision or authorized State agency that
the person cited for the violation under this subtitle, § 21–202.1, § 21–809, or § 21–810 of
this article, or § 10–110 or § 10–112 of the Criminal Law Article has failed to either:
(i) Pay the fine for the violation by the date specified in the citation;
or

HOUSE BILL 441
(ii) File a notice of his intention to stand trial for the violation;
(2) It is notified by the District Court that a person who has elected to stand
trial for the violation under this subtitle, under § 21–202.1, § 21–809, or § 21–810 of this
article, or under § 10–110 or § 10–112 of the Criminal Law Article has failed to appear for
trial; or
(3) It is notified by a U.S. District Court that a person cited for a violation
under a federal parking regulation:
(i) Has failed to pay the fine for the violation by the date specified
in the federal citation; or
(ii) Either has failed to file a notice of the person’s intention to stand
trial for the violation, or, if electing to stand trial, has failed to appear for trial.
(b) (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the
Administration may suspend the registration of a vehicle involved in a parking violation
under this subtitle or a violation under any federal parking regulation that applies to
property in this State under the jurisdiction of the U.S. government if notified in accordance
with subsection (a) of this section that the violator is a chronic offender.
(2) The Administration may adopt rules and regulations to define chronic
offender and develop procedures to carry out the suspension of registration as authorized
by this subsection.
(3) FOR A VIOLATION RECORDED BY A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM
ON MARYLAND ROUTE 210 (INDIAN HEAD HIGHWAY) IN PRINCE GEORGE’S
COUNTY, THE ADMINISTRATION:
(I) MAY SUSPEND A VEHICLE REGISTRATION AS AUTHORIZED
UNDER § 21–809(G)(2)(II) OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(II) SHALL SUSPEND A VEHICLE REGISTRATION AS REQUIRED
UNDER § 21–809(G)(2)(III) OF THIS ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.